Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
Article 4 Sale of Payment Instruments
7-1-687.
Notice of action against licensee by creditor or claimant; other notification requirements.

A licensee shall give written notice to the department of any action which may be brought against it by any creditor or claimant where such action relates to the activities authorized under this article or involves a claim against the bond filed with the department under Code Section 7-1-683.2. The notice shall provide details sufficient to identify the action and shall be sent within 30 days after the commencement of any such action. The licensee shall also give written notice to the department within 30 days of the entry of any judgment entered against the licensee.

The corporate surety shall, within ten days after it pays any claim to any creditor or claimant, give notice to the department by registered or certified mail of such payment with details sufficient to identify the claimant or creditor and the claim or judgment so paid. Whenever the principal sum of such bond is reduced by one or more recoveries or payments thereon, the licensee shall furnish a new or additional bond so that the total or aggregate principal sum of such bond or bonds shall equal the sum required under Code Section 7-1-683.2 or shall furnish an endorsement duly executed by the corporate surety reinstating the bond to the required principal sum thereof.

A bond filed with the department for the purpose of compliance with Code Section 7-1-683.2 shall not be canceled by either the licensee or the corporate surety except upon notice to the department electronically through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry, and such cancellation shall be effective no sooner than 30 days after receipt by the department of such notice and only with respect to any breach of condition occurring after the effective date of such cancellation.

A licensee shall give written notice to the department within ten days of the following:

Any knowledge or discovery of an act prohibited by Code Section 7-1-684 or 7-1-691 or subsection (a) of Code Section 7-1-692;

The discharge of any employee for actual or suspected misrepresentations, dishonest acts, or fraudulent acts;

Any knowledge or discovery of the discharge of a covered employee or an authorized agent for actual or suspected misrepresentations, dishonest acts, or fraudulent acts;

Any knowledge or discovery of an administrative, civil, or criminal action initiated by any government entity against the licensee or an authorized agent; any director, officer, partner, or ultimate equitable owner of the licensee or authorized agent; or any individual who directs the affairs of or controls or establishes policy for the licensee or authorized agent; or

The filing of a petition by or against the licensee under the United States Bankruptcy Code, 11 U.S.C. Sections 101 through 110, for bankruptcy reorganization or the filing of a petition by or against the licensee for receivership or the making of a general assignment for the benefit of its creditors.

Unless prior approval of a change in executive officer is required under Code Section 7-1-688 and notwithstanding subsection (e) of Code Section 7-1-684 requiring a criminal background check prior to the initial date of hire, a licensee shall notify the department in writing of any change of executive officer in such a manner that the notice is received by the department no later than ten business days after the effective date of the change. In the event of such change, the licensee shall initiate a criminal background check no later than ten business days after the effective date of the change. If the department determines that an executive officer does not meet the requirements of subsections (a) or (b) of Code Section 7-1-684, the department may disapprove the notice of change, and the licensee shall remove the individual from the executive officer position upon receipt of the disapproval.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-687

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 1/HB 982; Ga. L. 2017, p. 193, § 22/HB 143; Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 18/HB 780; Ga. L. 2020, p. 320, § 14/HB 781; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 31/HB 891.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 3, 2018, deleted “which may be” following “any judgment” in the last sentence of subsection (a); and added subsection (e). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, deleted “by registered or certified mail, statutory overnight delivery with return receipt requested, or” preceding “electronically” in the middle of subsection (c).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, deleted “by registered or certified mail” following “to the department” in the first and third sentences of subsection (a) and in the introductory language of subsection (d); inserted “written” in the last sentence in subsection (a); revised punctuation in paragraph (d)(4); and added the last sentence in subsection (e).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 26(b)/HB 780, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “It is not the intent of the General Assembly to affect the law applicable to litigation pending as of March 9, 2018.”

7-1-688.
Approval required of new ultimate equitable owner, other change of control, or executive officer of licensee; denial of application; application of statute.

Except as provided in this Code section, no person shall become an ultimate equitable owner of any licensee through acquisition or other change in control or become an executive officer of a licensee as a result of such acquisition or other change in control unless the person has first received written approval for such acquisition, change in control, or designation as an executive officer from the department. In order to obtain such approval, such person shall:

File an application with the department in such form as the department may prescribe from time to time;

Provide such other information as the department may require concerning the financial responsibility, background, experience, and activities of the applicant, its directors and executive officers, if a corporation, and its members, if applicable, and of any proposed new directors, executive officers, members, or ultimate equitable owners of the licensee; and

Pay such application fee as the department may prescribe.

The department may prescribe additional requirements for approval of such acquisition, change in control, or designation as an executive officer as a result of such acquisition or other change in control through rules and regulations.

If the application is denied, the department shall notify the applicant of the denial and the reasons for the denial.

The application provisions of this Code section shall not apply to:

An acquisition by a passive investor, provided that such person submits documentation to the department, in a form prescribed by the department, establishing that such person meets the criteria for a passive investor prior to such acquisition. The failure to provide acceptable documentation establishing that the person qualifies as a passive investor or to continuously satisfy the passive investor requirements shall require the filing of a change of control application; or

An acquisition of a licensee by a person licensed by the department under this article, provided that:

The person has not had a license revoked or suspended in any jurisdiction;

The person is well-managed and has received at least a satisfactory rating for compliance and supervision at its most recent examination by the department or a state agency whose money transmitter regulatory program has been accredited by the appropriate governing authority;

The resulting entity or entities are projected to meet the financial condition requirements established by this article;

Neither the person nor the licensee to be acquired will implement any material changes to their respective business plans as a result of the acquisition; and

The person provides the department with prior notice of the acquisition and attests to the requirements provided in this paragraph in a form prescribed by the department. If the department does not approve such notice of acquisition within 30 days of the date on which the notice was determined by the department to be complete, the notice is deemed approved. If the department disapproves such notice of acquisition, the acquiring person shall be required to file a change of control application.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-688

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 1/HB 982; Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 19/HB 780; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 32/HB 891.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 3, 2018, inserted “as a result of such acquisition or other change in control” in the first sentence of the introductory paragraph of subsection (a) and in subsection (b). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added subsection (d).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 26(b)/HB 780, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “It is not the intent of the General Assembly to affect the law applicable to litigation pending as of March 9, 2018.”

7-1-689.
Record keeping; investigations and examinations by department; subpoenas; confidentiality; limitations on civil liability.

Each licensee shall make, keep, and use in its business such books, accounts, and records as the department may require to enforce the provisions of this article and the rules and regulations promulgated under it. Each licensee shall preserve such books, accounts, and records for five years or such greater period of time as prescribed in the department’s rules and regulations.

Records required to be made, kept, and preserved pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section may be maintained in a photographic, electronic, or other similar form.

Records required to be made, kept, and preserved pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section may be maintained at a location outside of this state so long as such records are produced to the commissioner at the department’s main office within ten days of the date of a written request by the department to the licensee.

The department shall investigate and examine the affairs, business, premises, and records of any licensee or authorized agent pertaining to the sale of payment instruments or money transmission. The department may conduct such investigations or examinations at least once every 60 months. The department may accept examination reports performed and produced by other state or federal agencies in satisfaction of this requirement unless the department determines that the examinations are not available or do not provide information necessary to fulfill the responsibilities of the department under this article.

Notwithstanding subsection (d) of this Code section, the department may alter the frequency or scope of investigations or examinations through rules or regulations prescribed by the department. In addition, if the department determines that based on the records submitted to the department and past history of operations of the licensee in the state such investigations or examinations are unnecessary, then the department may waive such investigations and examinations.

In addition to any other authority set forth under this article, the department shall be authorized to conduct investigations and examinations of applicants, licensees, and authorized agents as follows:

The department shall have the authority to access, receive, and use any books, accounts, records, files, documents, information, or evidence, including, but not limited to:

Criminal, civil, and administrative history information, including nonconviction data;

Personal history and experience information, including, but not limited to, independent credit reports obtained from a consumer reporting agency described in the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 1681a;

For an individual who has resided outside of the United States, an international investigative background report prepared by a competent independent search firm, which shall include, at a minimum, comprehensive credit, criminal, employment, media, and financial services regulatory history information; and

Any other documents, information, or evidence the department deems relevant to the inquiry, examination, or investigation regardless of the location, possession, control, or custody of such documents, information, or evidence;

The department may review, investigate, or examine any licensee or person subject to this article as often as necessary in order to carry out the purposes of this article;

Each licensee or person subject to this article shall make available to the department, upon request, any books and records relating to the activities of selling payment instruments or the transmission of money;

No licensee or person subject to investigation or examination under this article shall knowingly withhold, abstract, remove, mutilate, destroy, or secrete any books, records, documents, files, computer records, evidence, or other information; and

In order to carry out the purposes of this Code section, the department may:

Enter into agreements or relationships with other government officials or regulatory associations in order to improve efficiencies and reduce regulatory burden by sharing resources, documents, records, information, or evidence or by utilizing standardized or uniform methods or procedures;

Accept and rely on examination or investigation reports made by other government officials within or outside this state, including, but not limited to, investigations pursuant to a multistate licensing process;

Accept audit reports or portions of audit reports made by an independent certified public accountant on behalf of the licensee or person subject to this article covering the same general subject matter as the audit and may incorporate the audit report in the report of examination, report of investigation, or other writing of the department; and

Use, hire, contract, or employ analytical systems, methods, or software.

Each licensee shall pay an examination fee as established by the rules and regulations of the department to cover the cost of an examination or investigation.

The department, in its discretion, may:

Make such public or private examination or investigation within or outside of this state as it deems necessary to determine whether any person has violated this article, any rule or regulation, or order issued under this article, to aid in the enforcement of this article, or to assist in the prescribing of rules and regulations pursuant to this article;

Require or permit any person to file a statement in writing, under oath or otherwise, as to all the facts and circumstances concerning the matter to be investigated;

Request any financial data from an applicant or licensee; and

Conduct an on-site examination of a licensee or authorized agent at any location of the licensee or authorized agent without prior notice to the licensee or authorized agent. The licensee shall pay all reasonably incurred costs of the examination when the department examines the operations of its authorized agent. The department is authorized to net its out-of-state travel expenses incurred as a result of an examination or investigation of a licensee or authorized agent against the payment from the licensee.

For the purpose of conducting any examination or investigation as provided in this Code section, the department shall have the power to administer oaths, to call any party to testify under oath in the course of such examinations or investigations, to require the attendance of witnesses, to require the production of books, accounts, records, documents, and papers, and to take the depositions of witnesses; and for such purposes the department is authorized to issue a subpoena for any witness or for the production of documentary evidence. Such subpoenas may be served by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, return receipt requested, to the addressee’s business mailing address or by examiners appointed by the department or shall be directed for service to the sheriff of the county where such witness resides or is found or where the person in custody of any books, accounts, records, documents, or papers resides or is found.

The department may issue and apply to enforce subpoenas in this state at the request of any government agency, department, organization, or entity regulating the sale of payment instruments or money transmission in another state if the activities constituting the alleged violation for which the information is sought would be a violation of this article if the alleged activities had occurred in this state.

In case of refusal to obey a subpoena issued under this article to any person, a superior court of appropriate jurisdiction, upon application by the department, may issue to the person an order requiring him or her to appear before the court to show cause why he or she should not be held in contempt for refusal to obey the subpoena. Failure to obey a subpoena may be punished as contempt by the court.

Examinations and investigations conducted under this article and information obtained by the department in the course of its duties under this article are confidential, except as provided in this subsection, pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 7-1-70. In addition to the exceptions set forth in subsection (b) of Code Section 7-1-70, the department is authorized to share information obtained under this article with other state and federal regulatory agencies or law enforcement authorities. In the case of such sharing, the safeguards to confidentiality already in place within such agencies or authorities shall be deemed adequate. The commissioner or an examiner specifically designated may disclose such information as is necessary to conduct a civil or administrative investigation or proceeding. Information contained in the records of the department that is not confidential and may be made available to the public either on the department’s website, upon receipt by the department of a written request, or in the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry shall include:

The name, business address, and telephone, facsimile, and unique identifier of a licensee;

The names and titles of the principal officers;

The name of the owner or owners thereof;

The business address of a licensee’s registered agent for service;

The name, business address, telephone number, and facsimile number of all locations of a licensee;

The name, business address, telephone number, and facsimile number of all authorized agents;

The terms of or a copy of any bond filed by a licensee;

Information concerning any violation of this article, any rule or regulation, or order issued under this article, provided that the information is derived from a final order of the department; and

Imposition of an administrative fine or penalty under this article.

The authority to conduct an examination or investigation as provided for in this Code section shall remain in effect whether such licensee or person acts or claims to act under any licensing or registration law of this state or claims to act without such authority.

In the absence of malice, fraud, or bad faith, a person is not subject to civil liability arising out of furnishing the department with information required by this article or required by the department under the authority granted in this article. No civil cause of action of any nature shall arise against such person:

For any information relating to suspected prohibited conduct furnished to or received from law enforcement officials, their agents, or employees or to or from other regulatory or licensing authorities;

For any such information furnished to or received from other persons subject to the provisions of this article; or

For any information furnished in complaints filed with the department.

The commissioner or any employee or agent of the department shall not be subject to civil liability, and no civil cause of action of any nature shall exist against such persons arising out of the performance of activities or duties under this article or by publication of any report of activities under this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-689

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 1/HB 982; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 7/HB 90; Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 20/HB 780; Ga. L. 2019, p. 828, § 28/HB 185; Ga. L. 2020, p. 320, § 15/HB 781; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 33/HB 891.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 3, 2018, in the last sentence of the introductory paragraph of subsection (l), substituted “website, upon” for “website or upon” and inserted “, or in the Nation-wide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” near the end. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “60 months” for “24 months” at the end of the second sentence of subsection (d).

The 2020 amendments.

The first 2020 amendment, effective January 1, 2021, substituted “unique identifier” for “license numbers” in paragraph (l)(1). The second 2020 amendment, effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” for “Nation-wide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” in the last sentence of subsection (l).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, deleted “and” from the end of subparagraph (f)(1)(B), added subparagraph (f)(1)(C), redesignated former subparagraph (f)(1)(C) as subparagraph (f)(1)(D), substituted “state, including, but not limited to, investigations pursuant to a multistate licensing process;” for “state; and” at the end of subparagraph (f)(5)(B), added “; and” at the end of subparagraph (f)(5)(C), and added subparagraph (f)(5)(D).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 26(b)/HB 780, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “It is not the intent of the General Assembly to affect the law applicable to litigation pending as of March 9, 2018.”

7-1-690.
Enforcement; enactment of rules and regulations.

Without limiting the power conferred by Article 1 of this chapter, the department may make reasonable rules and regulations, not inconsistent with law, for the interpretation and enforcement of this article.

The department is authorized to enact rules and regulations that apply solely to persons engaged in money transmission or the sale of payment instruments involving virtual currency. The department shall enact such rules and regulations it finds necessary to:

Foster the growth of businesses engaged in money transmission or the sale of payment instruments involving virtual currency in Georgia and spur state economic development;

Ensure the continued solvency, safety, soundness, and prudent conduct of persons engaged in money transmission or the sale of payment instruments involving virtual currency;

Ensure fair, timely, and equitable fulfillment of the financial obligations of such persons;

Protect customers of businesses engaged in money transmission or the sale of payment instruments involving virtual currency from financially impaired or insolvent providers of such services;

Encourage high standards of honesty, transparency, fair business practices, and public responsibility;

Eliminate financial fraud, other criminal abuse, and unethical conduct in the industry; and

Ensure businesses engaged in money transmission or the sale of payment instruments involving virtual currency provide customers with timely and understandable information in order that customers may make informed decisions about virtual currency products and services.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-690

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 1/HB 982; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 1-7/HB 811.

7-1-691.
Prohibited activities while engaged in sale of checks or money transmission.

It shall be prohibited for any person engaged in the sale of checks or money transmission in this state, including any person required to be licensed under this article, to:

Sell payment instruments as an agent of a principal seller who is not exempt from the licensure requirements under Code Section 7-1-682 and has not obtained a license hereunder, and any person who does so shall be deemed to be the principal seller thereof and not merely an agent and shall be liable to the payment instrument holder or remitter as the principal seller;

Receive, transmit, or handle monetary value on behalf of another or issue a payment instrument and not be exempt from licensure under Code Section 7-1-682, and any person who does so shall be liable to the payment instrument holder for the payment thereof to the same extent as a drawer of a negotiable instrument, whether or not the payment instrument is a negotiable instrument under Article 3 of Title 11;

Fail to transmit moneys received within five business days of receiving such moneys; or

Engage in any activity that would subject a licensee to suspension or revocation of its license under this article or any activity that the department may prohibit pursuant to rule or regulation, whether or not the person has a license.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-691

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 1/HB 982.

7-1-692.
Suspension or revocation of license; failure to issue license; grounds; administrative review.

The department may suspend or revoke an original or renewal license issued pursuant to this article or rescind the authorization to act as an authorized agent of a licensee if it finds that any ground or grounds exist which would require or warrant the refusal of an application for the issuance or renewal of a license or the authorization to act as an authorized agent of a licensee if such an application or notification were then before it. The department may also deny an application, suspend or revoke an original or renewal license issued pursuant to this article, or rescind the authorization to act as an authorized agent of a licensee if it finds that the licensee or the authorized agent has:

Committed any fraud, engaged in any dishonest activities, or made any misrepresentation;

Violated any provisions of this article, any rule or regulation issued pursuant thereto, any order issued by the department, or any other law in the course of its dealings as a licensee or authorized agent;

Made a false statement in an original or renewal application for licensure or failed to give a true reply to a question in an original or renewal application;

Demonstrated incompetency or untrustworthiness to act as a licensee or authorized agent;

Failed to pay, within 30 days after it becomes final, a judgment recovered in any court by a claimant or creditor in an action arising out of the licensee’s business in this state of engaging in the sale of payment instruments or money transmission;

Purposely withheld, deleted, destroyed, or altered information requested by an examiner of the department or made false statements or misrepresentations to the department; or

Operated in an unsafe or unsound manner.

The department shall not issue a license to an applicant, may rescind the authorization to act as an authorized agent of a licensee, and may revoke a license if such applicant, licensee, or authorized agent is subject to or employs any person subject to a final cease and desist order that has been issued within the preceding five years if such order was based on a violation of this article. Each applicant or licensee shall, before hiring a covered employee, examine the department’s public records to determine that such covered employee is not subject to a cease and desist order.

The department shall not issue a license to an applicant, may rescind the authorization to act as an authorized agent of a licensee, and may revoke a license if such applicant, licensee, or authorized agent is subject to or employs any person whose license issued pursuant to this article was revoked within the preceding five years. Each applicant or licensee shall, before hiring a covered employee, examine the department’s public records to determine that such covered employee’s license was not revoked.

The department shall not issue a license to an applicant, may rescind the authorization to act as an authorized agent of a licensee, and may revoke a license if it finds that any person who is a director, officer, partner, ultimate equitable owner of the applicant, licensee, or authorized agent or any individual who directs the affairs of or controls or establishes policy for the applicant, licensee, or authorized agent has been in one or more of those roles as a licensee whose application has been denied or license revoked or suspended within five years of the date of the application.

Notice of the department’s intention to enter an order denying an application for a license, rescinding the authorization to act as an authorized agent of a licensee, or suspending or revoking a license shall be given to the applicant, authorized agent, or licensee in writing, sent by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery addressed to the principal place of business of such applicant, authorized agent, or licensee. If a person refuses to accept service of the notice by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, the notice or order shall be served by the commissioner or the commissioner’s authorized representative under any other method of lawful service, and the person shall be personally liable to the commissioner for a sum equal to the actual costs incurred to serve the notice or order. This liability shall be paid upon notice and demand by the commissioner or the commissioner’s representative and shall be assessed and collected in the same manner as other fees or fines administered by the commissioner. Within 20 days of the date of the notice of intention to enter an order of denial, suspension, revocation, or rescission under this article, the applicant, authorized agent, or licensee may request in writing a hearing to contest the order. If a hearing is not requested in writing within 20 days of the date of such notice of intention, the department shall enter a final order regarding the denial, suspension, or revocation. Any final order of the department denying an application, suspending or revoking a license, or rescinding authorization to act as an authorized agent shall state the grounds upon which it is based and shall be effective on the date of issuance. A copy thereof shall be forwarded promptly by mail addressed to the principal place of business of such applicant, authorized agent, or licensee.

A decision by the department denying an application for license or of an order suspending or revoking a license shall be subject to review in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

Whenever the department initiates an administrative action against a current licensee or an applicant, the department may pursue such action to its conclusion despite the fact that a licensee may withdraw or fail to renew its license or an applicant may withdraw its application.

The suspension or revocation of a license under this Code section does not alter, ameliorate, or void a licensee’s duties or liabilities under any existing contract entered into by the licensee prior to such suspension or revocation.

The provisions of this Code section shall not apply when an application for a license is denied or a license is suspended as provided in Code Section 7-1-693.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-692

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 1/HB 982.

7-1-693.
Applicant or licensee as borrower in default; failure to pay child support prohibits licensure.

Where an applicant or licensee has been found to be a borrower in default under the Georgia Higher Education Loan Program as determined by the Georgia Higher Education Assistance Corporation or has been certified by any entity of the federal government for nonpayment or default or breach of a repayment or service obligation under any federal educational loan, loan repayment, or service conditional scholarship program, such action shall not be grounds for refusal of a license or suspension of a license.

Where an applicant or licensee has been found not in compliance with an order for child support as provided in Code Section 19-6-28.1 or 19-11-9.3, such action shall be sufficient grounds for refusal of a license or suspension of a license. In such actions, the hearing and appeal procedures provided for in Code Section 19-6-28.1 or 19-11-9.3 shall be the only such procedures required under this article. The department shall be permitted to share, without liability, information on its applications or other forms with appropriate state agencies to assist them in recovering child support when required by law.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-693

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 1/HB 982; Ga. L. 2019, p. 462, § 1-2/SB 214.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in subsection (a), rewrote the first sentence, which read: “Where an applicant or licensee has been found to be a borrower in default, as defined in Code Section 20-3-295, such action shall be sufficient grounds for refusal of a license or suspension of a license.” and deleted the former last two sentences, which read: “In such actions, the hearing and appeal procedures provided for in said Code section shall be the only procedures required under this article. The department shall be permitted to share, without liability, information on its applications or other forms with appropriate state agencies to assist them in collecting outstanding student loan debt.”

7-1-694.
Cease and desist orders from unauthorized activities; civil penalties for violations; judicial review; administrative fines.

The department may issue an order requiring a person to cease and desist immediately from unauthorized activities whenever it shall appear to the department that:

Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, a person has violated any law of this state or any order or regulation of the department, and such cease and desist order shall be final 20 days after it is issued unless the person to whom it is issued makes a written request within such 20 day period for a hearing;

A person not licensed under this article is engaging in or has engaged in activities requiring licensure under this article, which such cease and desist order shall be final 30 days from the date of issuance, and there shall be no opportunity for an administrative hearing. If the proper license or evidence of exemption is obtained within the 30 day period, the order shall be rescinded by the department; or

A person licensed under this article has received a notice of bond cancellation under Code Section 7-1-687, which such cease and desist order shall be final 20 days from the date of issuance, and there shall be no opportunity for an administrative hearing. In the event the cease and desist order becomes final, the license shall expire, and if a new license is desired, the licensee shall be required to make a new application for a license and pay all applicable fees as if it had never been licensed. If the required surety bond is reinstated or replaced and such documentation is delivered to the department within the 20 day period following the date of issuance of the order, the order shall be rescinded.

The cease and desist order shall be in writing, sent by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, and addressed to the person’s business address and, if the person is an individual, to the individual’s personal address. Any cease and desist order sent to a person at its business address and, if an individual, his or her personal address that is returned to the department as “refused” or “unclaimed” shall be deemed as received and lawfully served.

Any hearing authorized under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

Whenever a person shall fail to comply with the terms of a final order or decision of the department issued pursuant to this article, the department may, through the Attorney General and upon notice of three days to such person, petition the principal court for an order directing such person to obey the order of the department within the period of time as shall be fixed by the court. Upon the filing of such petition, the court shall allow a motion to show cause why it should not be granted. After a hearing upon the merits or after failure of such person to appear when ordered, the court shall grant the petition of the department upon a finding that the order of the department was properly issued.

Any person who violates the terms of any final order or decision issued pursuant to this article shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000.00. Each day the violation continues shall constitute a separate offense. In determining the amount of penalty, the department shall take into account the appropriateness of the penalty relative to the size of the financial resources of such person, the good faith efforts of such person to comply with the order, the gravity of the violation, the history of previous violations by such person, and such other factors or circumstances as shall have contributed to the violation. The department may at its discretion compromise, modify, or refund any penalty which is subject to imposition or has been imposed pursuant to this Code section. Any person assessed as provided in this subsection shall have the right to request a hearing into the matter within ten days after notification of the assessment has been served upon the licensee involved; otherwise, such penalty shall be final except as to judicial review as provided in Code Section 7-1-90.

Judicial review of any final order or decision of the department entered pursuant to this article shall be available solely in the superior court of the county of domicile of the department.

In addition to any other administrative penalties authorized by this article, the department may, by rule or regulation, prescribe administrative fines for violations of this article and any rules and regulations promulgated by the department pursuant to this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-694

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 1/HB 982; Ga. L. 2020, p. 320, § 16/HB 781.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “20” for “30” in the first and last sentences in paragraph (a)(3).

7-1-695.
Liability for payment.

Every payment instrument issued in the conduct of the business regulated by this article shall be signed by the licensee or its authorized agent, and the licensee shall be liable for the payment thereof to the same extent as a drawer of a negotiable instrument, whether or not the payment instrument is a negotiable instrument under Article 3 of Title 11.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-695

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 1/HB 982.

7-1-696.
Penalties for violations.

Any person, partnership, association, or corporation and the several members, officers, directors, agents, ultimate equitable owners, and employees thereof that shall violate any of the provisions of this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, which shall be punishable by imprisonment for not more than one year or by a fine of not more than $500.00, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-696

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 1/HB 982.